North Dakota statutes. TITLE 8 Carriage
CHAPTER 8-06 Carriage of Messages

8-06-01.
Delivery of message.

A carrier of messages for reward shall deliver a message at the place to which it is addressed or to the person for whom it is intended.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1253; R.C. 1895, § 4222; R.C. 1899, § 4222; R.C. 1905, § 5670; C.L. 1913, § 6233; R.C. 1943, § 8-0601.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2161.

8-06-02.
Degree of care required.

A carrier of messages for reward shall use great care and diligence in the transmission and delivery of messages. A carrier by telegraph shall use the utmost diligence therein.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1254; R.C. 1895, § 4223; R.C. 1899, § 4223; R.C. 1905, § 5671; C.L. 1913, § 6234; R.C. 1943, § 8-0602.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2162.